Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1743
Marketing plan contract; purchaser; right to cancel; when.

The purchaser shall have the right to cancel a seller-assisted marketing plan contract for any reason at any time within three business days of the date the purchaser and the seller sign the contract pursuant to section 59-1744. The notice of the right to cancel and the procedures to be followed when a contract is canceled shall comply with sections 59-1743 and 59-1744.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 43.